fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX wN Y 41
SFX wN aire aire/n'q'd'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire aisant/n'q'd'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire ais/j'n'q'l'm't' aire
SFX wN aire ait/n'q'l'm't's' taire
SFX wN aire aît/n'q'l'm't's' plaire
SFX wN aire ait/n'q'l'm't's' plaire
SFX wN aire aisons/n'q'l't' aire
SFX wN aire aisez/n'q'l'm' aire
SFX wN aire aisent/n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire aisais/j'n'q'l'm't' aire
SFX wN aire aisait/n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire aisions/n'q'l't' aire
SFX wN aire aisiez/n'q'l'm' aire
SFX wN aire aisaient/n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire us/j'n'q'l'm't' aire
SFX wN aire ut/n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire ûmes/n'q'l't' aire
SFX wN aire ûtes/n'q'l'm' aire
SFX wN aire urent/n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire airai/j'n'q'l'm't' aire
SFX wN aire airas/n'q'l'm't' aire
SFX wN aire aira/n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire airons/n'q'l't' aire
SFX wN aire airez/n'q'l'm' aire
SFX wN aire airont/n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire airais/j'n'q'l'm't' aire
SFX wN aire airait/n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire airions/n'q'l't' aire
SFX wN aire airiez/n'q'l'm' aire
SFX wN aire airaient/n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire aise/j'n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire aises/n'q'l'm't' aire
SFX wN aire usse/j'n'q'l'm't' aire
SFX wN aire usses/n'q'l'm't' aire
SFX wN aire ût/n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire ussions/n'q'l't' aire
SFX wN aire ussiez/n'q'l'm' aire
SFX wN aire ussent/n'q'l'm't's' aire
SFX wN aire ais/n'l'm't' aire
SFX wN aire aisons/n'l't' aire
SFX wN aire aisez/n'l'm' aire

SFX wO Y 43
SFX wO aindre aindre/n'q'd'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignant/n'q'd'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aint/L'D'Q' aindre
SFX wO aindre aints/D'Q' aindre
SFX wO aindre ainte/L'D'Q' aindre
SFX wO aindre aintes/D'Q' aindre
SFX wO aindre ains/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aint/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignons/n'q'l't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignez/n'q'l'm' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignent/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignais/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignait/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignions/n'q'l't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aigniez/n'q'l'm' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignaient/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignis/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignit/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignîmes/n'q'l't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignîtes/n'q'l'm' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignirent/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrai/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aindras/n'q'l'm't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aindra/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrons/n'q'l't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrez/n'q'l'm' aindre
SFX wO aindre aindront/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrais/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrait/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrions/n'q'l't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aindriez/n'q'l'm' aindre
SFX wO aindre aindraient/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aigne/j'n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignes/n'q'l'm't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignisse/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignisses/n'q'l'm't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignît/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignissions/n'q'l't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignissiez/n'q'l'm' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignissent/n'q'l'm't's' aindre
SFX wO aindre ains/n'l'm't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignons/n'l't' aindre
SFX wO aindre aignez/n'l'm' aindre

SFX wP Y 43
SFX wP aincre aincre/n'q'd'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquant/n'q'd'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincu/L'D'Q' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincus/D'Q' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincue/L'D'Q' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincues/D'Q' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincs/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainc/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquons/n'q'l't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquez/n'q'l'm' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquent/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquais/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquait/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquions/n'q'l't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquiez/n'q'l'm' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquaient/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquis/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquit/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquîmes/n'q'l't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquîtes/n'q'l'm' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquirent/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincrai/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincras/n'q'l'm't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincra/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincrons/n'q'l't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincrez/n'q'l'm' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincront/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincrais/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincrait/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincrions/n'q'l't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincriez/n'q'l'm' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincraient/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainque/j'n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainques/n'q'l'm't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquisse/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquisses/n'q'l'm't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquît/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquissions/n'q'l't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquissiez/n'q'l'm' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquissent/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre
SFX wP aincre aincs/n'l'm't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquons/n'l't' vaincre
SFX wP aincre ainquez/n'l'm' vaincre

SFX wQ Y 72
SFX wQ tre tre/n'q'd'l'm't's' tre
SFX wQ aître aissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' aître
SFX wQ aitre aissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' aitre
SFX wQ aître ais/j'n'q'l'm't' aître
SFX wQ aître aît/n'q'l'm't's' aître
SFX wQ aître aissons/n'q'l't' aître
SFX wQ aître aissez/n'q'l'm' aître
SFX wQ aître aissent/n'q'l'm't's' aître
SFX wQ aitre ais/j'n'q'l'm't' aitre
SFX wQ aitre ait/n'q'l'm't's' aitre
SFX wQ aitre aissons/n'q'l't' aitre
SFX wQ aitre aissez/n'q'l'm' aitre
SFX wQ aitre aissent/n'q'l'm't's' aitre
SFX wQ aître aissais/j'n'q'l'm't' aître
SFX wQ aître aissait/n'q'l'm't's' aître
SFX wQ aître aissions/n'q'l't' aître
SFX wQ aître aissiez/n'q'l'm' aître
SFX wQ aître aissaient/n'q'l'm't's' aître
SFX wQ aitre aissais/j'n'q'l'm't' aitre
SFX wQ aitre aissait/n'q'l'm't's' aitre
SFX wQ aitre aissions/n'q'l't' aitre
SFX wQ aitre aissiez/n'q'l'm' aitre
SFX wQ aitre aissaient/n'q'l'm't's' aitre
SFX wQ aître us/j'n'q'l'm't' aître
SFX wQ aître ut/n'q'l'm't's' aître
SFX wQ aître ûmes/n'q'l't' aître
SFX wQ aître ûtes/n'q'l'm' aître
SFX wQ aître urent/n'q'l'm't's' aître
SFX wQ aitre us/j'n'q'l'm't' aitre
SFX wQ aitre ut/n'q'l'm't's' aitre
SFX wQ aitre ûmes/n'q'l't' aitre
SFX wQ aitre ûtes/n'q'l'm' aitre
SFX wQ aitre urent/n'q'l'm't's' aitre
SFX wQ tre trai/j'n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX wQ tre tras/n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX wQ tre tra/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wQ tre trons/n'q'l't' tre
SFX wQ tre trez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX wQ tre tront/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wQ tre trais/j'n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX wQ tre trait/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wQ tre trions/n'q'l't' tre
SFX wQ tre triez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX wQ tre traient/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX wQ aître aisse/j'n'q'l'm't's' aître
SFX wQ aître aisses/n'q'l'm't' aître
SFX wQ aitre aisse/j'n'q'l'm't's' aitre
SFX wQ aitre aisses/n'q'l'm't' aitre
SFX wQ aître usse/j'n'q'l'm't' aître
SFX wQ aître usses/n'q'l'm't' aître
SFX wQ aître ût/n'q'l'm't's' aître
SFX wQ aître ussions/n'q'l't' aître
SFX wQ aître ussiez/n'q'l'm' aître
SFX wQ aître ussent/n'q'l'm't's' aître
SFX wQ aitre usse/j'n'q'l'm't' aitre
SFX wQ aitre usses/n'q'l'm't' aitre
SFX wQ aitre ût/n'q'l'm't's' aitre
SFX wQ aitre ussions/n'q'l't' aitre
SFX wQ aitre ussiez/n'q'l'm' aitre
SFX wQ aitre ussent/n'q'l'm't's' aitre
SFX wQ aître ais/n'l'm't' paraître
SFX wQ aître ais/n'l'm't' connaître
SFX wQ aître aissons/n'l't' paraître
SFX wQ aître aissons/n'l't' connaître
SFX wQ aître aissez/n'l'm' paraître
SFX wQ aître aissez/n'l'm' connaître
SFX wQ aitre ais/n'l'm't' paraitre
SFX wQ aitre ais/n'l'm't' connaitre
SFX wQ aitre aissons/n'l't' paraitre
SFX wQ aitre aissons/n'l't' connaitre
SFX wQ aitre aissez/n'l'm' paraitre
SFX wQ aitre aissez/n'l'm' connaitre
