fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.dic
apparaitre/wQq+
apparaître/wQq+
comparaitre/wQq.
comparaître/wQq.
complaire/wNq.
connaitre/wQq+
connaître/wQq+
contraindre/wO
convaincre/wP
craindre/wO
déplaire/wNq.
disparaitre/wQq+
disparaître/wQq+
méconnaitre/wQq+
méconnaître/wQq+
paraitre/wQq+
paraître/wQq+
plaindre/wO
plaire/wNq.
réapparaitre/wQq+
réapparaître/wQq+
recomparaitre/wQq.
recomparaître/wQq.
reconnaitre/wQq+
reconnaître/wQq+
reparaitre/wQq+
reparaître/wQq+
taire/wNq+
transparaitre/wQq.
transparaître/wQq.
vaincre/wP
